Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-9,137
College or university; violation; liability.

A college or university which subjects or causes to be subjected any student to a rule or regulation adopted, promulgated, or enforced in violation of section 85-9,134 shall be liable to the aggrieved party in an action at law, a suit in equity, or any other proper proceeding for redress. In addition to any other relief granted, an aggrieved party shall be awarded costs and reasonable attorney's fees.

Laws 1991, LB 69, § 5.